src/scripts/Czech/g2p.foma
# Copyright (C) 2023 Darko Milosevic <daremc86@gmail.com>, Zvonimir Stanecic

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, either version 2.1 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <https://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.

define InitialTranscribe 
# Now, we should define some phonemes which represents something symillar as schwa for vocalize R and L
а:ax1 | 
и:iii1 | 
a:a | 
ä:e | 
á:aa | 
b:b | 
c:c | 
č:ts | 
d:d | 
[dz]:dz | 
ď:dj | 
e:e | 
é:ee | 
ě:ije | 
f:f | 
g:g | 
h:h | 
i:i | 
í:ii | 
j:j | 
k:k | 
l:l | 
ľ:[l j] | 
ĺ:l | 
m:m | 
n:n | 
ň:nj | 
o:o | 
ö:e | 
ó:oo | 
ô:[u o] | 
p:p | 
q:[k v] | 
r:r | 
ř:rz | 
ŕ:r | 
s:s | 
š:sh | 
t:t | 
ť:tj | 
u:u | 
ü:y | 
ú:uu | 
ů:ou | 
w:v | 
v:v | 
x:[k s] | 
y:y | 
ý:yy | 
z:z | 
ž:zh ; 

define Digraphs 
[c h]:[hh] | 
[d zh]:[dzh] | 
[m ě]:[m nj e] | 
[d ije]:[dj e] | 
[t ije]:[tj e] | 
[n ije]:[nj e] | 
[d i]:[dj i] | 
[t i]:[tj i] | 
[n i]:[nj i] | 
[d ii]:[dj ii] | 
[t ii]:[tj ii] | 
[n ii]:[nj ii] ; 

define SpecialRules 
[c g]:[dz g] | 
[tsh g]:[dzh g] | 
[c d]:[dz d] | 
[tsh d]:[dzh d] | 
[c b]:[dz b] | 
[tsh b]:[dzh b] ; 

define Stage1 InitialTranscribe @-> ; 
define Stage2 Digraphs @-> ; 
define Stage3 SpecialRules @-> ; 

define VowelPhonem [a | aa | e | ee | i | ii | o | oo | u | uu | ou | y | yy | iii1 | ax1 ] ;
define ConsonantPhonem [b|c|ts|d|dj|dz|dzh|f|g|h|hh|j|k|l|m|n|nj|p|r|rz|s|sh|t|tj|v|z|zh] ;

define tgStress a0:a1|aa0:aa1|e0:e1|ee0:ee1|ije0:ije1|i0:i1|ii0:ii1|iii0:iii1|o0:o1|oo0:oo1|u0:u1|uu0:uu1|ou0:ou1|y0:y1|yy0:yy1|ax0:ax1;
define noStressV  a0 | aa0 | e0 | ee0 | ije0 | i0 | ii0 | iii0 | o0 | oo0 | u0 | uu0 | ou0 | y0 | yy0 | ax0 ;
define stressV  a1 | aa1 | e1 | ee1 | ije1 | i1 | ii1 | iii1 | o1 | oo1 | u1 | uu1 | ou1 | y1 | yy1 | ax1 ;
define vowel  noStressV  | stressV;
define pc   \vowel;
define pcx   pc - StressMark;
define noStress noStressV | pc | StressMark;

define vowelizeR  r -> [iii0 r]  || pc _ pcx ,,
ax0 -> iii0 || _ r ; 

define vowelizeL  l -> [iii0 l]  || pc _ pcx ,,
ax0 -> iii0 || _ l ; 


source stress.foma
source unicodechars.foma

regex Stage1 .o.
Stage2 .o.
Stage3 .o.
UnicodeToNativeTranslit .o. 
procStressG2p .o.
procStress2 .o.
vowelizeR .o.
vowelizeL ;
